Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB460.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6 and 7 of the act of December 30, 1974 (P.L.1072, No.347), referred to as the Governor and Lieutenant Governor Disability Procedure Law, are amended to read:Section 1. Whenever the Governor transmits to the General Assembly [his] and the Lieutenant Governor a written declaration that [he is unable to discharge] the Governor is incapacitated DISABLED and unable to discharge the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Governor, and until [he transmits to it] a written declaration to the contrary is transmitted by the Governor, [such] the powers and duties shall be discharged by the Lieutenant Governor as Acting Governor as provided in <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 Article IV, section thirteen of the Constitution.Section 2. Whenever the Lieutenant Governor and a majority of the Governor's Cabinet as defined herein transmit to the General Assembly their written declaration that the Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Governor, the Lieutenant Governor shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting Governor as provided in Article IV, section thirteen of the Constitution.Section 3. [Thereafter] Following a declaration of incapacitation DISABILITY under section 2 , when the Governor transmits to the General Assembly [his] a written declaration that no disability exists, [he] the Governor shall resume the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of the Governor at the expiration of four days unless within that period the Lieutenant Governor and a majority of the Governor's Cabinet as defined herein transmit to the General Assembly another written declaration that the Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Governor.Thereupon, the General Assembly shall immediately decide the issue, assembling within forty-eight hours for that purpose if not in session. If the General Assembly, within twenty-one days after receipt of the latter written declaration, or if the General Assembly is not in session, within twenty-one days after the General Assembly is required to assemble, determines by two-thirds vote of each House that the Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of the [office] Office of Governor, the Lieutenant Governor shall continue to discharge the same as 20250SB0460PN1150 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Acting Governor; otherwise, the Governor shall resume the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Governor.Section 4. Whenever the Lieutenant Governor transmits to the Governor and the General Assembly a written declaration that [he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office] the Lieutenant Governor is incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of the Office of Lieutenant Governor, and until [he transmits to them] a written declaration to the contrary[, such] is transmitted by the Lieutenant Governor, the powers and duties shall be discharged by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as Acting Lieutenant Governor as provided in Article IV, section fourteen of the Constitution.Section 5. Whenever the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and a majority of the Governor's Cabinet as defined herein transmit to the General Assembly [their] a written declaration that the Lieutenant Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of [his office] Office of Lieutenant Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting Lieutenant Governor as provided in Article IV, section fourteen of the Constitution.Section 6. [Thereafter,] After declaration of incapacitation DISABILITY under section 5, when the Lieutenant Governor transmits to the General Assembly [his] a written declaration that no disability exists, [he] the Lieutenant Governor shall resume the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Lieutenant Governor at the expiration of four days unless within that period the President Pro Tempore and a majority of the Governor's Cabinet as defined herein, transmit to the General 20250SB0460PN1150 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Assembly a written declaration that the Lieutenant Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Lieutenant Governor.Thereupon, the General Assembly shall immediately decide the issue, assembling within forty-eight hours for that purpose if not in session. If the General Assembly within twenty-one days after receipt of the latter written declaration, or if the General Assembly is not in session, within twenty-one days after the General Assembly is required to assemble, determines by two-thirds vote of each House that the Lieutenant Governor is [unable to discharge] incapacitated DISABLED and incapable of discharging the powers and duties of the office, the President Pro Tempore shall continue to discharge the same as Acting Lieutenant Governor; otherwise, the Lieutenant Governor shall resume the powers and duties of [his office] the Office of Lieutenant Governor .Section 7. For the purpose of this statute the Governor's Cabinet shall be the heads of the Administrative Departments as defined in the [Administrative Code of 1929,] act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), [as amended,] known as The Administrative Code of 1929, or any successor statute, who hold office by appointment of the Governor.A written declaration shall be transmitted to the General Assembly by hand delivery, email or facsimile to the offices of the [clerks of the House and the Senate, and immediately upon receipt of such declaration it shall be the duty of the clerks forthwith to communicate the entire declaration to each member of the House and Senate by a telegram, supplemented by such other prompt communication as may be desirable under the 20250SB0460PN1150 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circumstances.] President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. A written declaration shall be transmitted to the Governor and the Lieutenant Governor by hand delivery, email or facsimile.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0460PN1150 - 5 - 1234567